Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 4 Tennessee Cosmetology Act of 1986
62-4-110. Application and qualifications for practicing or teaching — Fees.

Any person who desires a cosmetologist's license shall submit an application for examination to the board on the prescribed form. The application shall be accompanied by:

A nonrefundable, nontransferable application/examination fee as set by the board;

Satisfactory proof that the applicant has attained the age of at least sixteen (16) years; and

Satisfactory proof that the applicant either:

Has completed and passed a course of instruction of no less than one thousand five hundred (1,500) hours in practice and theory at a school of cosmetology; or

Holds a valid Tennessee master barber registration and has completed three hundred (300) hours in a licensed school of cosmetology learning the fundamentals of cosmetology technique and pedicuring.

Any person who desires a license to practice manicuring only shall submit an application for examination to the board on the prescribed form. The application shall be accompanied by:

A nonrefundable, nontransferable application/examination fee as set by the board; and

Satisfactory proof that the applicant has attained the age of at least sixteen (16) years and has completed and passed a course of instruction of no less than six hundred (600) hours in the practice and theory of manicuring at a school of cosmetology.

Any person who desires a license to instruct in a school shall submit an application for examination to the board on the prescribed form. The application shall be accompanied by:

A nonrefundable, nontransferable application/examination fee as set by the board; and

Satisfactory proof that the applicant:

Is a high school graduate, evidenced by a certificate or diploma or possesses a general equivalency diploma (GED(R));

Holds a valid cosmetologist's, manicurist's, aesthetician's or natural hair stylist's license issued by the board;

Has completed and passed a board-approved course in instructor training of at least three hundred (300) hours within a period of six (6) months as an instructor trainee or has served as a junior instructor for a minimum of one (1) year;

Has been licensed as a cosmetologist, aesthetician, manicurist, or natural hair stylist pursuant to this chapter for at least three (3) continuous years; and

Seeks to instruct only in the area in which the applicant is currently licensed.

Any person who desires a license to practice aesthetics only shall submit an application for examination to the board on the prescribed form. The application shall be accompanied by:

A nonrefundable, nontransferable application/examination fee as set by the board; and

Satisfactory proof that the applicant has attained the age of at least sixteen (16) years and has completed and passed a course of instruction of no less than seven hundred fifty (750) hours in the practice and theory of aesthetics at a school of cosmetology.

Any person who desires a natural hair styling license shall submit an application for examination to the board on the prescribed form. The application shall be accompanied by:

A nonrefundable, nontransferable application/examination fee as set by the board; and

Satisfactory proof that the applicant has attained the age of at least sixteen (16) years and has completed and passed a course of instruction of no less than three hundred (300) hours in the practice and theory of natural hair styling at a school of cosmetology.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 10; 1987, ch. 112, § 4; 1988, ch. 902, §§ 2-5; 1989, ch. 93, § 6; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 109-112; 1996, ch. 897, §§ 4, 5, 20; 2007, ch. 485, § 3; 2015, ch. 402, § 17; 2015, ch. 450, § 1; 2017, ch. 226, § 3; 2017, ch. 227, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2015, ch. 450, § 2 provided that the act, which added (c)(2)(D) and (E), shall apply to applications submitted on or after July 1, 2015.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253.

Do Your Job: Judicial Review of Occupational Licensing in the Face of Economic Protectionism, 70 Vand. L. Rev. 1663 (2017).

62-4-111. Examinations.

Examinations of applicants for licenses under § 62-4-110 shall be held at such times and places and shall consist of such materials or practical demonstrations as the board may determine.

The board shall identify for any unsuccessful applicant the subject or subjects failed on the examination.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 11; 1988, ch. 902, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

62-4-112. License fees — Penalties.

The board shall issue a license to qualified applicants upon receipt of the appropriate fee.

The board shall prescribe fees and penalties under this chapter pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 12; 1987, ch. 112, § 5; 1988, ch. 902, § 7; 1989, ch. 523, § 113.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Cross-References. Examination fees, § 62-4-110.

Instructor license renewal fee, § 62-4-114.

Reciprocity license fee, § 62-4-116.

Renewal fees, § 62-4-117.

Replacement or correction of license, fee § 62-4-115.

School license fees, § 62-4-120.

Shop license fees, § 62-4-118.

62-4-113. Display of license — Notice of address changes — Penalty.

Every holder of a license as a cosmetologist, aesthetician, manicurist, natural hair stylist or instructor shall:

Prominently display the license at the holder's work station; and

Promptly notify the board of any change of mailing address within thirty (30) calendar days of such change.

Pending issuance or denial by the board of the appropriate license, a person may work as a cosmetologist, aesthetician, manicurist, natural hair stylist or instructor if the person prominently displays at the person's work station:

The official notice from the board that the person has passed the required examination; and

A copy of a money order made payable to the state of Tennessee in the amount of the fee for a license or the receipt for the payment of the fee.

Failure to display the information required in subsection (b) is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 13; 1987, ch. 112, § 6; 1988, ch. 902, § 8; 1996, ch. 897, §§ 21, 22; 2015, ch. 402, §§ 18-20.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanors, § 40-35-111.

62-4-114. Instructor's continuing education — Practice by instructor — Instructor may become licensed as cosmetologist — Inactive status.

To maintain an active instructor's license, an instructor shall every two (2) years submit to the board satisfactory proof that the instructor has attended a board-approved instructor training program in cosmetology, manicuring, aesthetics or natural hair styling for a minimum of sixteen (16) hours. Persons obtaining an initial instructor's license shall attend a board-approved instructor training program in cosmetology, manicuring, aesthetics or natural hair styling after receiving the licenses.

The board may, in its discretion, grant up to one (1) additional year for submission of proof upon a showing of good cause, including, but not limited to, illness or emergency; however, no extension of time shall relieve an instructor from meeting any future deadline for compliance with this subsection (a).

The active license of any instructor who fails to comply with this subsection (a) shall become invalid and nonrenewable.

Before an instructor's license expires, an instructor may notify the board of the instructor's intention to place the license on inactive status. The notice of intention shall be accompanied by the regular license fee, but the instructor shall be relieved of the obligation to attend the otherwise required board-approved training program. An instructor may stay on inactive status as long as the appropriate fees are paid on a regular basis. To change a license from inactive status to active status, the instructor shall attend a board approved instructor training program in cosmetology, manicuring, aesthetics or natural hair styling for a minimum of sixteen (16) hours.

Any person who holds a valid active license as a cosmetology, manicuring, aesthetics or natural hair instructor may engage in the practice of cosmetology, manicuring, aesthetics or natural hair styling under that license; however, no instructor may render cosmetology, manicuring, aesthetics or natural hair styling services in a school, except services that are directly incidental to the instruction of students.

Any person whose instructor's license expires or becomes invalid may, within sixty (60) days after the date of expiration or invalidity, obtain a cosmetologist's, manicurist's, aesthetician's or natural hair stylist's license from the board upon payment of a fee set by the board.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 14; 1992, ch. 968, §§ 1-5; 1996, ch. 897, § 6; 2001, ch. 85, § 1; 2007, ch. 485, §§ 4-7; 2015, ch. 402, § 21.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

62-4-115. Fee for replacement or correction of license.

A fee as set by the board will be charged for:

Replacement of any lost, misplaced or mutilated license; or

Change of name or mailing address by any cosmetologist, aesthetician, manicurist, natural hair stylist or instructor licensed under this chapter.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 15; 1987, ch. 112, § 7; 1988, ch. 902, § 9; 1989, ch. 523, § 114; 1996, ch. 897, § 23.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Former § 62-4-115 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, § 7; 1949, ch. 179, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 7139.7 (Williams, § 7139.22); Acts 1951, ch. 227, § 2; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 10, 17; 1972, ch. 808, § 2; 1975, ch. 122, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.) § 62-415), concerning licensing of manicurists and shampooers, was repealed by Acts 1982, ch. 633, § 8.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

62-4-116. Reciprocity — License without examination.

Upon receipt of a fee as set by the board in rule, the board may, in its discretion, grant a license without examination to any applicant who:

Holds a valid license issued by another state or the District of Columbia and has substantially met the qualifications for licensure in this state; or

Furnishes satisfactory proof that the applicant has continuously and lawfully engaged in the occupation or practice for which a license is applied for a period of at least five (5) years immediately preceding the date of application.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 16; 1996, ch. 897, § 8; 2015, ch. 402, § 22.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

62-4-117. Duration and renewal of licenses — Fees — Lapsed licenses.

All cosmetologist, aesthetician, manicurist, natural hair stylist and instructor licenses shall expire on the biennial anniversary date of the licenses and shall be invalid on that date unless renewed.

If the board is satisfied that this chapter has been complied with, licenses issued in accordance with this chapter may be renewed for another term upon completion and submission of the prescribed form, accompanied by the proper fee as set by the board.

A penalty fee as set by the board will be assessed on any renewal application postmarked after the expiration date of the license issued in accordance with this chapter.

A license issued in accordance with this chapter that has lapsed for three (3) years or longer shall not be reinstated unless the applicant passes the state law and practical examination.

Any person who holds, or applies and qualifies for, a cosmetology license on or before August 31, 1987, may practice both cosmetology and aesthetics for so long as the license, and any renewal of the license, remains valid.

Any person who holds a manicurist/shampoo license may practice both manicuring and shampooing for so long as the license, and any renewal of the license, remains valid.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 17; 1987, ch. 112, §§ 8, 9, 11; 1988, ch. 902, § 10; 1989, ch. 360, §§ 4, 5; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 115-117, 123; 1990, ch. 1026, § 38; 1996, ch. 897, §§ 9, 10, 24; 2014, ch. 964, §§ 9, 10; 2015, ch. 402, § 23.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Director of division of regulatory boards to promulgate rules concerning certain license renewal dates, § 56-1-302.

Law Reviews.

Do Your Job: Judicial Review of Occupational Licensing in the Face of Economic Protectionism, 70 Vand. L. Rev. 1663 (2017).

Attorney General Opinions. Right to practice aesthetics under grandfather provision, OAG 99-110, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 110 (5/13/99).

62-4-118. Operation of a shop.

Except as otherwise provided under this chapter, it is unlawful to operate a shop without conspicuously displaying a valid license issued by the board under this chapter.

Each shop licensed by the board shall designate a manager. The shop shall submit the name and license information of its manager upon application and renewal.

It is unlawful to operate a shop unless it is, at all times, under the direction of a manager or designated manager. While on duty, the manager or designated manager shall be responsible for the shop's compliance with this chapter, chapter 3 of this title, and the rules of the board. The board may require the name of the shop's manager or designated manager to be posted in such form and location as the board may prescribe.

The manager and designated manager may manage those who practice disciplines in cosmetology or barbering, other than the discipline in which the manager or designated manager is licensed; however, the manager or designated manager shall only practice within the field that the person is licensed.

An application for a license to operate a shop shall be submitted by its owner on the form prescribed by the board. The application shall include:

The location of the shop;

The type of shop;

The name of the manager; and

Other information that the board may require.

Prior to the opening of a new shop or the relocation of an existing shop, the shop must pass an initial inspection after submission of a complete application for a license to operate the shop in accordance with subsection (e), accompanied by the fee for licensure and the fee for inspection, as prescribed by the board in rule. The inspection shall be made within ten (10) days of receipt by the board of a request for the inspection. If the shop passes the required inspection, the board shall issue a license to operate the shop unless the board refuses to issue the license pursuant to § 62-4-127(b) or as otherwise provided by this chapter, chapter 3 of this title, and the rules of the board.

If the ownership of a shop changes, the new owner shall not operate the shop more than thirty (30) days after the date of the change of ownership unless, within the thirty-day period, the new owner has:

Submitted an application for a license to operate the shop in accordance with subsection (e); and

Paid the license fee and the inspection fee.

If the transferred shop passes the required inspection, the board shall issue a license to operate the shop unless the board refuses to issue the license pursuant to § 62-4-127(b) or as otherwise provided by this chapter, chapter 3 of this title, and the rules of the board.

Pending issuance or denial by the board of a license to operate a shop, the owner may operate the shop if the owner displays:

The official report showing that the shop has passed the required inspection; and

A copy of a cashier's check or money order made payable to the state of Tennessee in the amount of the fee for the license.

Each shop shall be inspected at least annually.

All licenses to operate a shop shall expire on the last day of the month of the biennial anniversary date of the licenses.

If the board is satisfied that the requirements of this chapter have been met, licenses to operate a shop may be renewed for another term upon completion and submission of the prescribed form, accompanied by the renewal fee prescribed by the board in rule.

A penalty fee as set by the board by rule will be assessed on any renewal application postmarked after the expiration date of the license.

The board may promulgate any and all rules necessary to allow for a shop where services are performed or offered to be performed in more than one (1) field of cosmetology, including aesthetics, natural hair styling, and manicuring, or in both cosmetology, or a field of cosmetology, and barbering to operate as a dual shop, including, but not limited to, rules to allow a dual shop to pay a single licensure or renewal fee and to undergo a single inspection.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 18; 1987, ch. 112, § 10; 1988, ch. 902, § 13; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 118-122, 124-130; 1996, ch. 897, §§ 11, 12; 2015, ch. 402, §§ 24, 25; 2016, ch. 838, § 7.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 25 purported to amend § 62-3-118, but actually amended § 62-4-118.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Director of division of regulatory boards to promulgate rules concerning certain license renewal dates, § 56-1-302.

62-4-119. Responsibilities of owner and manager of shop.

The owner and manager of a shop shall be responsible for ensuring that:

Only persons duly licensed by the board perform cosmetology services in the shop;

Persons duly licensed by the board perform only those services authorized by their licenses; and

The shop and its operation conform to this chapter and any rules duly promulgated under this chapter.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.